Hawaii statutes.
[§457-8.9] Advanced practice registered
nurses; expedited partner therapy. Advanced practice registered nurses who
meet the definition of a health professional as defined in section 453-51,
shall be authorized to provide expedited partner therapy in accordance with
part III of chapter 453. [L 2013, c 250, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next